Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Chapter 29. Drainage Districts with Local Commissioners
§ 51-29-147.
Petition and notice of consolidation.

Upon the adoption of such resolution, the said board of commissioners of said drainage district may file its petition in the chancery court of any one of the counties in which it embraces land, requesting said court, or the chancellor thereof in vacation, to set a date for a hearing upon said proposal, either in term time or vacation, not less than three weeks after the date of the decree fixing the same, and to direct the clerk of said court to give notice of the time, date, and place of such hearing by publication at least once each week for two consecutive weeks. Such notice shall be published in a newspaper or newspapers having general circulation in each of the counties in which any of said districts shall embrace land, the date of the first publication to be not less than ten days prior to the date set for said hearing. Said notice shall be addressed to the officials, landowners, taxpayers, and other persons interested in said drainage districts proposed to be affected by said consolidation, shall contain a statement that written protests or objections to the proposed consolidation may be filed with the clerk of said court at any time prior to the date set for said hearing, and shall state that a failure to so file such written protest or objection prior to said date shall forever bar and preclude such protest or objection. Said notice may be in substantially the following form:

NOTICE TO THE OFFICIALS, LANDOWNERS, AND TAXPAYERS OF, AND OTHER PERSONS INTERESTED IN (Here name all of the drainage districts proposed to be affected): Notice is hereby given that the Board of Commissioners of (here insert name of the drainage district making the proposal) has filed its petition in the Chancery Court of County, Mississippi, proposing to combine the territory of (here insert names of tributary drainage districts proposed to be consolidated) with that of said (drainage district making proposal), so as to form of such combined territory a single consolidated drainage district embracing the territory of all of said districts, under the governing authority of a single Board of Commissioners to be appointed by said court (or chancellor in vacation), said proposed consolidated drainage district to have all of the power and authority of a drainage district organized and existing under Chapter 29, Title 51, Mississippi Code of 1972. Notice is further given that said matter has been set for hearing by the Chancery Court of County, Mississippi (or the chancellor thereof in vacation, as the case may be) at o’clock M. on the day of 20, at the county court house at , Mississippi; and that any official, landowner or taxpayer of, or other person interested in any of the aforesaid drainage districts, who desires to oppose such proposed consolidation, must file his protest or objection in writing with the clerk of said court prior to said date set for said hearing, and that a failure to do so before said date forever will preclude and bar such protest or objection. Witness my hand and seal of office, this day of 20 Clerk of the Chancery Court of County, Mississippi.

Click to view

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4752-02; Laws, 1950, ch. 430, § 2.

§ 51-29-149.
Consolidation hearing and decree.

At said hearing, the court or chancellor in vacation, as the case may be, shall hear the written protests and objections against the proposed consolidation of said districts, if any be filed prior to the date set for said hearing; and unless, prior to said date of hearing, a majority of the landowners of said districts proposed to be consolidated, owning half or more of the combined land of said districts, shall have filed their written protests or objections against said proposed consolidation, shall enter a final decree, which shall have the force and effect of a judgment, consolidating said districts into a single drainage district embracing the combined territory of all of said several districts. The consolidated drainage district so formed shall have all of the power and authority of a drainage district organized under the provisions of this chapter, and shall have full, complete, and exclusive jurisdiction over such combined territory and of the complete and integrated systems of drainage of the said districts so consolidated. Any person aggrieved by said decree may appeal to the supreme court within twenty days after the date thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4752-03; Laws, 1950, ch. 430, § 3.

§ 51-29-151.
Commissioners of consolidated district.

In the event of such consolidation as provided in Sections 51-29-145 through 51-29-157, the court or chancellor in vacation immediately shall proceed to name said consolidated district, and to appoint to govern the same a board of commissioners to consist of five members, three of whom shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and who shall possess the same qualifications now required by law for drainage commissioners. Two of such commissioners shall be appointed for a term of two years, two for terms of four years, and one for a term of six years, and all shall serve until their successors are appointed. Upon the expiration of the initial term of any commissioner, his successor shall serve for a term of six years and until his successor is appointed. The commissioners so appointed shall take and subscribe the oath required by law, and enter into bond for the faithful performance of their duties in a penalty to be fixed by the court or chancellor, to be approved by the clerk of said court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4752-04; Laws, 1950, ch. 430, § 4.

§ 51-29-153.
Transfer of powers of former commissioners.

When said board of commissioners of said consolidated district have been appointed and have qualified as required by law, the several boards of commissioners of the said separate drainage districts shall cease to exist, and their power and authority shall terminate. They shall be divested of all of the power and authority theretofore vested in said several boards of commissioners, and all of their said power and authority and jurisdiction in respect to the territory and drainage improvements of their said respective separate districts shall vest in, and thereafter be exercised by, said board of commissioners of said consolidated district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4752-05; Laws, 1950, ch. 430, § 5.

§ 51-29-155.
Lien of outstanding obligations not impaired by consolidation.

Nothing in Sections 51-29-145 through 51-29-157, nor in any proceedings had under the provisions thereof, shall have the effect of impairing, releasing, or abrogating the lien of the principal of, or interest on, any outstanding bonds, notes, or other obligations of any of the said several drainage districts referred to herein. Such liens are hereby expressly retained and preserved, and the property of any of said drainage districts having any such bonds, notes, or other obligations outstanding at the time of said consolidation shall continue and remain liable for taxation as theretofore for the payment thereof as the same mature and become due. It shall be the duty of said board of commissioners of said consolidated district annually to cause to be levied taxes against said property in any such district, sufficient to pay and discharge any such bonds, notes, or other obligations of such district as they mature and become due.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4752-06; Laws, 1950, ch. 430, § 6.

§ 51-29-157.
Powers and authority of consolidated district.

Said consolidated drainage district shall have the same authority, power and jurisdiction over the combined territory of said separate districts, and over the integrated system of drainage thereof, as if it were a district organized and existing under and by virtue of this chapter. Such district shall have the further and additional power, authority, and jurisdiction to assess said combined territory, or any part thereof, with additional benefits and to levy taxes thereon for the purpose of raising money to preserve the said integrated system of drainage thereof, to clean out, widen, maintain, extend, deepen, and maintain the main and lateral canals thereof, and to construct such other and new canals as the board of commissioners of said consolidated drainage district may find advantageous to the efficient drainage of the said combined territory. In the exercise of said authority, power, and jurisdiction, said consolidated drainage district shall not be bound by any assessment previously made in any of said separate drainage districts, and may assess the said combined lands with benefits without regard to any former assessment of benefits in any separate district. In making said assessments, levying taxes, and in exercising its authority, jurisdiction, and control, said consolidated drainage district shall, insofar as the same is not inconsistent with Sections 51-29-145 through 51-29-157, follow the procedures which shall have the effect provided by this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4752-07; Laws, 1950, ch. 430, § 7.

§ 51-29-159.
Mineral leases.

The board of commissioners of any drainage district heretofore and hereafter organized under the provision of this chapter are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to lease lands owned by the drainage district for oil, gas, and mineral exploration and development upon such terms and conditions and for such consideration as the board of commissioners of said district, in their discretion, shall deem proper and advisable.

Every such lease shall empower the lessee to enter upon the premises leased and to explore and develop such premises for oil, gas, or either of them, or such other minerals as may be included in the terms of said lease, and do all things necessary or expedient for the production and preservation of any such products.

All rentals, royalties, or other revenue payable under any leases executed pursuant to this section shall be paid to and collected by the treasurer of such drainage district, deposited in the drainage district fund, and used and expended in the same manner and subject to the same restrictions as provided by law in the case of other money belonging to such drainage district.

Any lease executed pursuant to this section shall inure to the benefit of the lessee named therein, his heirs and assigns, and in case the lessee be a corporation, to such lessee and its assigns.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4752.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 420, §§ 1-4.

§ 51-29-161.
Reforestation procedure.

The owner or owners of any tract or tracts of land situated within the boundaries of any drainage district that embraces land in more than one county of the state and was organized under this chapter may, in event the United States government, any agency or instrumentality thereof, or any corporation organized under an Act of the Congress of the United States for the purpose of engaging in any reforestation activity accepts a proposal of said owner or owners for the sale thereof, file a petition in the chancery court of the county in which the drainage district was organized, describing therein the tract or tracts of land in said district on which the proposal of said owner or owners for sale as aforesaid has been accepted as said tract or tracts are described in the assessment roll of the district, stating the total amount of assessments of benefits against each said tract and also the total amount thereof remaining unpaid at the time of the filing of such petition, and praying an acquittance of said tract or tracts from all outstanding indebtedness and assessments of benefits of said district whatever and a release thereof from the boundaries of said district on payment of the total amount of assessment of benefits of said district against said tract or tracts remaining unpaid on the filing of such petition. Thereupon the clerk of such chancery court shall issue notices, addressed to all the landowners of said district and to all holders of the outstanding indebtedness of said district, of a hearing on such petition at the next succeeding term of said court or in vacation at a time and place to be fixed by the chancellor, which notice shall be published in a weekly newspaper having a bona fide circulation in each county, any part of which is included within the boundaries of such district, for two successive issues.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4753; Laws, 1935, ch. 53.

§ 51-29-163.
Hearing on reforestation petition.

At said hearing, if said owner or owners shall have then paid over to the chancery clerk the amount set out in said petition and if all of the holders of not less than 95% in amount of the outstanding original indebtedness of the district and all of the holders of outstanding refunding bonds of said district shall have signified in writing, filed with the clerk of said court, their consent to receive the sum so paid as a credit on the said outstanding indebtedness held by them, the chancellor shall determine whether said amount is the true amount of the assessment of benefits of said district against said tract or tracts then remaining unpaid, whether or not the release of said tract or tracts as prayed for will interfere with the continued functioning of the improvements of said district, and whether or not the proposal of sale as set out in said petition is submitted in good faith and accepted as aforesaid. In event it is found that the sum tendered was the true amount of the assessments of benefits of said district against said tract or tracts remaining unpaid, that a release of said tract or tracts will not interfere with the continued functioning of the improvements made by said district, and that the proposal of sale as set out in said petition was submitted in good faith and accepted as aforesaid, the chancellor shall order an acquittance of said tract or tracts from liability for all the outstanding indebtedness of said district and release said tract or tracts from the boundaries of said district, on condition that the sale so proposed and accepted be consummated and a deed to said tract or tracts be delivered to the United States government, to any agency or instrumentality thereof, or to any corporation organized under an Act of the Congress of the United States for the purpose of engaging in reforestation activities. The effect of such order shall be to render said tract or tracts of land, on delivery of said deed, as fully free of any obligation, lien, or incumbrance arising from its inclusion in said district as if said tract or tracts had never been within said district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4754; Laws, 1935, ch. 53.

§ 51-29-165.
Disposition of proceeds of reforestation release.

On the rendition of said order the chancery clerk shall pay over to the board of commissioners of said district the amount so paid in to him, which amount shall be held in a special fund to be deposited with the depository of said district under all protections now provided by law for the deposit of funds of drainage districts. Said special fund shall only be withdrawn thereafter in annual installments of the exact amount of the tax which would have been raised by the levy for the year in question from said tract or tracts, had same not been released from the district, and used by the commissioners only in payment of outstanding indebtedness of the district. However, if the holder or holders of the outstanding indebtedness of the district chargeable against the assessed benefits thereof consent to the release of said land or lands from the district, the sum so paid by the landowners shall be paid to such consenting holders of said indebtedness and immediately credited thereon.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4755; Laws, 1935, ch. 53.